src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# South Sámi morphological analyser

# Multichar_Symbols definitions

## Tags for POS (Part-Of-Speech, Word class)
* **+N** = Noun
* **+A** = Adjective
* **+Adv** = Adverb
* **+V** = Verb
* **+Pron** = Pronomen
* **+CS** = Subjunction
* **+CC** = Conjunction
* **+Po** = Postposition
* **+Pr** = Preposition
* **+Interj** = Interjection
* **+Pcle** = Particle
* **+Num** = Numerals
* **+TODO** = Code for items that have not been modeled yet
* **+Logo** - ?
* **+Subqst** - used for adverbs
* **+Dyn** = Code dynamic acronyms

## Tags for sub-POS

### Proper nouns
* **+Prop** =

### Pronoun subtypes
* **+Pers** = Personal
* **+Dem** = Demonstrative
* **+Interr** = Interrogative
* **+Refl** = Reflexive
* **+Recipr** = Reciprocal
* **+Rel** = Relative
* **+Indef** = Indefinite

### Numeral subtypes
* **+Coll** = Collective numeral
* **+Arab** = Arabic numeral
* **+Rom** = Roman numeral

## Error (non-standard language) tags

|                     Error tag | Explanation
|                           --- | ---
| **+Err/Orth** | Substandard, unormert form av et ord
| **+Err/Hyph** | Substandard, unormert
| **+Err/SpaceCmp** | Substandard, unormert
| **+Err/Attr** | Substandard, unormert Attr-form av et ord
| **+Err/Lex** | lemma med dens ordformer er utenfor normen. <br/>No normative lemma, it's grammatically correct.
| **+Err/Der** | Errors in derivations
| **+Err/Spellrelax** | Used to tag spellrelaxed typos (tag is inserted via flag diacritics)
| **+Err/MissingSpace** | in use in smi lexc

### Usage tags

|                    Usage tag | Explanation
|                          --- | ---
| **+Use/Marg** | Marginal, korrekte, eksisterende former, men som er sjeldne. vi kan fjerne disse ordene f.eks fra speller, fordi de er så sjeldne og lite i bruk at de lemma som ligger nært kan bli forvekslet.
| **+Use/-Spell** | Excluded from speller
| **+Use/-PLX** | Excluded in PLX speller
| **+Use/SpellNoSugg** | Recognized but not suggested in speller
| **+Use/Circ** | Circular path
| **+Use/CircN** | Circular number path?
| **+Use/Ped** | Remove from pedagogical speller
| **+Use/NG** | Do not generate <br/> for isme-ped.fst and apertium
| **+Use/MT** | Generate for apertium only
| **+Use/NotDNorm** | For (spellings of) words that do not follow the orthographic principles of sma. Divvun suggest that this shouldn't be normative, even though they are decided upon by GG. Included in speller.
| **+Use/DNorm** | For words without formal normalization. Divvun suggest that this should be normative. Included in speller. Based on 2010 normative decision & Ove Lorentz' suggestions for the norm.
| **+Use/PMatch** | Do *only* include in fst's for hfst-pmatch
| **+Use/-PMatch** | Do not include in fst's made for hfst-pmatch
| **+Use/GC** | **only** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
| **+Use/-GC** | **never** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
| **+Use/TTS** | **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
| **+Use/-TTS** | **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

## Dialect tags

|            Dialect tag | Explanation
|                    --- | ---
| **+Dial/-S** | Not in the South
| **+Dial/S** | Only in the South
| **+Dial/-N** | Not in the North
| **+Dial/N** | Only in the North
| **+Dial/-NOR** | Words not in Norway
| **+Dial/NOR** | Words only in Norway
| **+Dial/-SW** | Words not in Sweden
| **+Dial/SW** | Words only in Sweden
| **+Dial/SH** | Short forms
| **+Dial/L** | Long forms

## Compounding tags
We use normative compounding tags to govern compound behaviour for the speller,
ie what a compound **should be**. We use descriptive compounding tags to describe
what a compound actually is. These two sets can be combined in the grammar
checker to identify and correct compounding errors.

### Normative: the left part of a compound should be ...

The default is `+CmpN/SgN`, so when nothing is specified, that
will be used. To override that one, specify one or more of the
following tags. `+CmpN/SgN` must be specified if also other tags
are listed - unless `+CmpN/SgN` should *not* be used, for course.

|    Normative compounding tag | Explanation
|                        :---- | :----
|  **+CmpN/Sg** | Singular
|  **+CmpN/SgN** | Singular Nominative
|  **+CmpN/SgG** | Singular Genitive
|  **+CmpN/PlG** | Plural Genitive

### Normative: the right part of a compound requires to the left ...

These tags overrule the regular tags defined above. One or more
can be specified.

| Normative left-governing tag | Explanation
|                          --- | ---
|  **+CmpN/SgLeft** | Sg to the left
|  **+CmpN/SgNomLeft** | Sg Nom to the left
|  **+CmpN/SgGenLeft** | Sg Gen to the left
|  **+CmpN/PlGenLeft** | Pl Gen to the left

### Normative: this part of the component can ...

|        Normative position tag | Explanation
|                           --- | ---
|  **+CmpNP/All** | ... be in all positions, **default**, this tag does not have to be written
|  **+CmpNP/First** | ... only be first part in a compound or alone
|  **+CmpNP/Pref** | ... only be **first** part in a compound, NEVER alone
|  **+CmpNP/Last** | ... only be last part in a compound or alone
|  **+CmpNP/Suff** | ... only be **last** part in a compound, NEVER alone
|  **+CmpNP/None** | ... not take part in compounds
|  **+CmpNP/Only** | ... only be part of a compound, i.e. can never be used alone, but can appear in any position

### Descriptive compounding tags
Tags for compound analysis - this is what a compound actually is. We use this
to research compounding patterns in the corpus.

| Descriptive compounding tag | Explanation
|                       --- | ---
|  **+Cmp/Sg** | Compounding using an unspecified singular stem
|  **+Cmp/SgNom** | Compounding using nominative singular
|  **+Cmp/SgGen** | Compounding using genitive singular
|  **+Cmp/PlGen** | Compounding using genitive plural
|  **+Cmp/Attr** | Compounding using attribute form
|  **+Cmp/eh** | Compound stem in **–eh**, as in *gaameh-gåaroje*, from *gaamege*
|  **+Cmp/ege** | Compound stem in **–ege**, as in *gaamege-gåaroje*
|  **+Cmp/FinEDel** | Deletion of final **e**, as in *voelem-gaaroeh*, from *voeleme*
|  **+Cmp/ShH** | Compounding using a short stem + **h**: *–biejjh–* (from *biejjie*), cf *reakedsbiejjhvadtese*
|  **+Cmp/Sh** | Compounding using a short stem: *–biejj–* (from *biejjie*)
|  **+Cmp/SplitR** | This is a split compound with the other part to the right: <br/> "Arbeids- og inkluderingsdepartementet" => *Arbeids–* = **+Cmp/SplitR**
|  **+Cmp/SplitL** | This is a split compound with the other part to the left, this is the oposite of the previous case
|  **+Cmp** | Dynamic compound - this tag should *always* be part of a dynamic compound. It is important for  Apertium and the speller (to give extra weights to compounds), and useful in other cases as well.
|  **+Cmp/XForm** | Alle Cmp som ikke har en klar klassifisering
|  **+Cmp/AttrH** | Alle Cmp som har en attr-h

# Tags for Inflection

## Tags for Case, Number & Possessive Inflection
### Case and number
* **+Sg** = Singular
* **+Pl** = Plural
* **+Du** = Dual

* **+Nom** = Nominative
* **+Acc** = Ackusative
* **+Gen** = Genitive
* **+Ine** = Inesive
* **+Ela** = Elative
* **+Ill**= Illative
* **+Com**= Comitative
* **+Ess** = Essive

## Possessive
* **+PxSg1** =  Possessives Singular
* **+PxSg2** =  Possessives Singular
* **+PxSg3** =  Possessives Singular
* **+PxDu1** =  Possessives Dual
* **+PxDu2** =  Possessives Dual
* **+PxDu3** =  Possessives Dual
* **+PxPl1** =  Possessives Plural
* **+PxPl2** =  Possessives Plural
* **+PxPl3** =  Possessives Plural

## Tense, Person & Number

|                                                 Tense tag | Explanation
|                                                       --- | ---
|  **+Prs** | Presens
|  **+Prt** | Preteritum

|                                  Person & Number tag | Explanation
|                                                  --- | ---
|  **+Sg1** | Singular, 1.person
|  **+Sg2** | Singular, 2.person
|  **+Sg3** | Singular, 3.person
|  **+Du1** | Dual    , 1.person
|  **+Du2** | Dual    , 2.person
|  **+Du3** | Dual    , 3.person
|  **+Pl1** | Plural  , 1.person
|  **+Pl2** | Plural  , 2.person
|  **+Pl3** | Plural  , 3.person

## Other verbal tags

|             Verbal tag | Explanation
|                    --- | ---
| **+Neg** | negation verb ij
| **+ConNeg** | main verb complement to Neg, form identical to Imp
| **+VAbess** | Verb Abessive
| **+Inf** | Infinitive and participles
| **+PrfPrc** | Infinitive and participles
| **+PrsPrc** | Infinitive and participles
| **+Ger** | Gerundium
| **+VGen** | Verbgenitive
| **+Ind** | Indicative
| **+Imprt** | Imperative
| **+ImprtII** | Imperative, for Neg:  ollem ollh ...
| **+Cond** | Kondisjonalis, for one form:  lidtjie. To be looked at.+ lidtjim, + lidtjih
| **+Act** | *-eme*, could be changed to `+Actio`

## Tags for adjectives

* **+Attr**:  Attribute form
* **+Ord**:  Ordinal number

## Other tags
* **+ABBR**:  Abbreviation
* **+Symbol**:  Symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
* **+ACR**:  Acronym
* **+TV**:  Transitive verb
* **+IV**:  Intansitive verb
* **+Gram/TAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviation (it needs an argument)
* **+Gram/TNumAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviation if the following
constituent is numeric
* **+Gram/TIAbbr**:  Both transitive and intransitive abbreviation
* **+Gram/IAbbr**:  Intransitive abbreviation (it takes no argument)
* **+Gram/NumNoAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviations for which numerals
* **+Multi**:  Multiword phrase tag ?
* **+Guess**:  for the name guesser ?
* **+LOAN**:  ad hoc tag for development purposes ?
* **+Cmp/Hyph**:  A tag to indicate that a hyphen was used when
compounding?

### Tags for testing the frequency of certain phenomenas in our corpora

* **+Test/LysI**:  form uses i
* **+Test/MørkI**:  form uses ï
* **+Test/HK**:  form uses consonant cluster hk
* **+Test/GK**:  form uses consonant cluster gk
* **+Test/JK**:  form uses consonant cluster jk
* **+Uml**:  A tag to indicate realised or potential Umlaut
* **+NoUml**:  A tag to indicate the lack of realised or potential Umlaut

### Tags for punctuation

* **+CLB**:  XXX These should be documented better
* **+PUNCT**:  XXX These should be documented better
* **+LEFT**:  XXX These should be documented better
* **+RIGHT +MIDDLE**:  XXX These should be documented better
* **+CLBfinal**  Sentence final abbreviated expression ending in full stop, so that the full stop is ambiguous

### Different focus particles

* **+Foc**:  XXX Document better = Forsterkende particle?
* **+Foc/ge**:  XXX Document better = Forsterkende particle
* **+Foc/gan**:  XXX Document better = Forsterkende particle
* **+Foc/gih**:  XXX Document better = Forsterkende particle
* **+Foc/gænnah**:  XXX Document better = Forsterkende particle

### Tags for adverbs and comparated adjectives
* **+Gram/Comp**
* **+Gram/Superl**

## Semantic tags

Semantic tags help disambiguation and syntactic analysis. All tags used are defined and listed below.
